District of Columbia statutes.
2-309.08

Repealed

Protest procedures.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 908, 32 DCR 7396
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 101(ee), 44 DCR 1423
May 8, 1998, D.C. Law 12-104, § 2(f), 45 DCR 1687
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
1981 Ed., § 1-1189.8.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(f) of the Procurement Reform Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-17, September 12, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 5459)
For temporary amendment of section, see § 3(f) of the Procurement Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-62, April 15, 1997, 44 DCR 2413), and see § 3(f) of the Procurement Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-133, August 12, 1997, 44 DCR 4832).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(f) of the Procurement Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-374, April 24, 1998, 45 DCR 4338).